District of Columbia statutes.
44-110.07

Health, light, and ventilation.

(a)

An ALR shall ensure that each facility is lighted and ventilated in accordance with Title 12 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (District of Columbia Construction Codes Supplement of 1992). Artificial night lights for corridors and exterior security lighting shall be installed.

(b)

Each room shall have either a functioning ceiling light fixture or another source of artificial light.

(c)

An ALR shall ensure that heating and air conditioning equipment is maintained to ensure that:

(1)

During waking hours, an interior temperature throughout the facility of at least 72 degrees Fahrenheit when outside temperatures are 65 degrees Fahrenheit or below, is maintained throughout the facility;

(2)

During sleeping hours, an interior temperature of at least 68 degrees Fahrenheit, when outside temperatures are 65 degrees Fahrenheit or below, is maintained throughout the facility;

(3)

For individual units, heating and air conditioning shall be maintained at a temperature which is comfortable for the individual resident, whenever practicable; and

(4)

When inside temperature exceeds 85 degrees Fahrenheit, mechanically cooled air shall be used in areas of the building used by residents with no inside area used by the residents allowed to exceed 90 degrees Fahrenheit.

June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-127, § 1007, 47 DCR 2647